Wisconsin, session 2025, SB549.
do enact as follows:SB549,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB549,26Section 2. 20.370 (1) (he) of the statutes is created to read:SB549,2,9720.370 (1) (he) Chronic wasting disease management. From the general fund, 8the amounts in the schedule for research on and the management of chronic 9wasting disease under s. 29.063 (1).SB549,310Section 3. 20.370 (1) (hs) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB549,2,111120.370 (1) (hs) (title) Chronic wasting disease management — fees.SB549,412Section 4. 29.063 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB549,2,141329.063 (1) The department may research, manage, and provide funding to 14conduct testing for, chronic wasting disease in cervids.SB549,2,1515